Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 207

Name

48-207-101. LLC name.

Name Requirements. An LLC name:

Must contain the words “limited liability company,” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.” or “LLC,” or words or abbreviations of like import in another language; provided, that they are written in roman characters or letters; and provided further, that, in the case of a foreign LLC, the name may contain, in lieu of the foregoing, the designations allowed by the jurisdiction in which the foreign LLC was formed or organized. An organization formed pursuant to chapter 248 of this title must contain the words or the abbreviation as required by § 48-248-301. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the name of an LLC or foreign LLC must not contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated” or an abbreviation of either or both these words; and

May not contain language stating or implying that the LLC:

Transacts or has the power to transact any business for which authorization in whatever form and however denominated is required under the laws of this state, unless the appropriate commission or officer has granted such authorization and certifies that fact in writing;

Is organized as, affiliated with, or sponsored by, any fraternal, veterans', service, religious, charitable, or professional organization, unless that fact is certified in writing by the organization with which affiliation or sponsorship is claimed;

Is an agency or instrumentality of, affiliated with or sponsored by the United States or any state thereof or a subdivision or agency thereof, unless such fact is certified in writing by the appropriate official of the United States or the state or subdivision or agency thereof; or

Is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by § 48-203-101 and the LLC's articles.

Name Must Be Distinguishable. Except as authorized by subsection (c), the name of a domestic LLC, and the name of a foreign LLC that is authorized to transact business in this state or is applying for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the respective names of or for every other entity, whether true, assumed, reserved or registered, to the extent the use or reservation of such names is evidenced by a filing with the secretary of state under applicable law.

Nondistinguishable Name of Entity Under Common Control. A domestic or foreign LLC, or person acting on behalf of an LLC not yet formed, may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (b). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for, if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of such name or change such name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents in writing to the use of such name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

Assumed Name.

An LLC or a foreign LLC authorized to transact business or applying for a certificate of authority to transact business may elect to adopt an assumed name that complies with the requirements of subsections (a)-(c), except that such name need not contain the designations contained in subdivision (a)(1).

As used in chapters 201-248 of this title, “assumed name” means any name used by the LLC, other than the LLC's true name, except that the following shall not constitute the use of an assumed name:

The identification by an LLC of its business with a trademark or service mark of which it is the owner or licensed user; and

The use of a name of a division, not separately organized and not containing the words “limited liability company” or an abbreviation of such words; provided, that the LLC also clearly discloses its name.

Before transacting any business in this state under an assumed name or names, the LLC shall, for each assumed name, pursuant to resolution by its governing body, execute and file in accordance with §§ 48-247-101 and 48-247-103, an application setting forth:

The true LLC name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to transact business under an assumed name; and

The assumed name which it proposes to use.

The right to use an assumed name shall be effective for five (5) years from the date of filing by the secretary of state.

An LLC shall renew the right to use its assumed name or names, if any, within the two (2) months preceding the expiration of such right, for a period of five (5) years, by filing an application to renew each assumed name and paying the renewal fee as prescribed by § 48-247-103(a).

Cancellation of Assumed Name. Any LLC or foreign LLC may, pursuant to resolution by its governing body, change or cancel any or all of its assumed names by executing and filing, in accordance with §§ 48-247-101 and 48-247-103, an application setting forth:

The true LLC name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to cease transacting business under an assumed name by changing or cancelling it;

The assumed name to be changed from or cancelled; and

If the assumed name is to be changed, the assumed LLC name which the LLC proposes to use.

Upon the filing of an application to change an assumed name, the LLC shall have the right to use such assumed name for the period authorized by subsection (d).

Cancellation of Assumed Name by Secretary of State. The right of a foreign or domestic LLC to use an assumed name shall be cancelled by the secretary of state if:

The LLC fails to renew an assumed name;

The LLC has filed an application to change or cancel an assumed name;

A domestic LLC has been dissolved; or

A foreign LLC has had its certificate of authority to transact business in this state revoked.

Unfair Competition. Nothing in this section, or in § 48-207-102 or § 48-207-103 shall abrogate or limit the law as to unfair competition or unfair trade practice, or derogate from the common law, the principles of equity, or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect trade names and trademarks.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 14; 2010, ch. 743, §§ 7, 8; 2017, ch. 333, § 2.

48-207-102. Reserved name.

Reserving a Name. A person may reserve the exclusive use of an LLC name, including an assumed name, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the LLC name applied for meets the requirements of § 48-207-101 and is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a four-month period. Upon the expiration of the four-month period, the same or any other party may apply to reserve the same name.

Transfer of Reserved Name. The owner of a reserved LLC name, including an assumed name, may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a notice of the transfer signed by the owner that states the name and address of the transferee.

Cancellation of Reserved Name. The reservation of a specific name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-207-103. Registered name.

Registration of Name. A foreign LLC may register its name, or an assumed name under which it transacts business, or its name with any addition pursuant to § 48-207-101(a), if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state as required by § 48-207-101(b).

Process for Registration. A foreign LLC registers its name, or its assumed name, or its name with any addition pursuant to § 48-207-101(a), by delivering to the office of the secretary of state for filing an application:

Setting forth its name, its assumed name, or its name with any addition pursuant to § 48-207-101(a), the state or country and date of its organization, and a brief description of the nature of the business in which it is engaged; and

Accompanied by a certificate copy of existence (or a document of similar import) from the state or country of organization, which certificate shall bear a date of not more than one (1) month prior to the date the application is filed in this state.

Effective Date of Registration. The name is registered for the applicant's exclusive use upon the effective date of the application and until the end of the calendar year in which such registration occurs.

Renewal of Registered Name. A foreign LLC whose registration is effective may renew it for successive years by delivering to the office of the secretary of state for filing a renewal application, which complies with the requirements of subsection (b), between October 1 and December 31 of the preceding year. The renewal application renews the registration for the following calendar year.

Use of Registered Name. A foreign LLC whose registration is effective may thereafter qualify as a foreign LLC under that name or consent in writing to the use of that name by an LLC thereafter organized under this title or by another foreign LLC thereafter authorized to transact business in this state. The registration terminates when the domestic LLC is organized or the foreign LLC qualifies or consents to the qualification of another foreign LLC under the registered name.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.